Utah statutes.
16-16-405.   Approval of amendment.
(1)  Subject to Section 16-16-404 and Subsections (3) and (4), an amendment to
the articles of organization shall be approved by:
(a)  at least two-thirds of the voting power of members present at a members
meeting called under Section 16-16-402; and
(b)  if the limited cooperative association has investor members, at least a
majority of the votes cast by patron members, unless the organic rules require
a greater percentage vote by patron members.
(2)  Subject to Section 16-16-404 and Subsections (3), (4), (5), and (6), an
amendment to the bylaws shall be approved by:
(a)  at least a majority vote of the voting power of all members present at a
members meeting called under Section 16-16-402, unless the organic rules
require a greater percentage; and
(b)  if a limited cooperative association has investor members, a majority of
the votes cast by patron members, unless the organic rules require a larger
affirmative vote by patron members.
(3)  The organic rules may require that the percentage of votes under
Subsection (1)(a) or (2)(a) be:
(a)  a different percentage that is not less than a majority of members voting
at the meeting;
(b)  measured against the voting power of all members; or
(c)  a combination of Subsections (3)(a) and (b).
(4)  Consent in a record by a member shall be delivered to a limited
cooperative association before delivery of an amendment to the articles of
organization or restated articles of organization for filing pursuant to
Section 16-16-407, if as a result of the amendment the member will have:
(a)  personal liability for an obligation of the association; or
(b)  an obligation or liability for an additional contribution.
(5)  The vote required to amend bylaws shall satisfy the requirements of
Subsection (1) if the proposed amendment modifies:
(a)  the equity capital structure of the limited cooperative association,
including the rights of the association's members to share in profits or
distributions, or the relative rights, preferences, and restrictions granted
to or imposed upon one or more districts, classes, or voting groups of
similarly situated members;
(b)  the transferability of a member's interest;
(c)  the manner or method of allocation of profits or losses among members;
(d)  the quorum for a meeting and the rights of voting and governance; or
(e)  unless otherwise provided in the organic rules, the terms for admission
of new members.
(6)  Except for the matters described in Subsection (5), the articles of
organization may delegate amendment of all or a part of the bylaws to the
board of directors without requiring member approval.
(7)  If the articles of organization delegate amendment of bylaws to the board
of directors, the board shall provide a description of any amendment of the
bylaws made by the board to the members in a record not later than 30 days
after the amendment, but the description may be provided at the next annual
members meeting if the meeting is held within the 30-day period.
